Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7099.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 32-1-16 and 32-1-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 32-1 entitled
"General Provisions" are hereby amended to read as follows:
32-1-16. Preference for residents with disabilities. Preference for residents, including
those with disabilities.
Residents of Rhode Island including, but not limited to, those who have a disability shall
be given preference in the use of campsites and other recreational facilities over nonresidents who
apply for permission to use those facilities. This preference shall be accomplished by providing
Rhode Island residents with a two (2) hour window on the online registration system to secure a
reservation before any nonresidents are authorized or permitted to make reservations.
32-1-17. Persons with disabilities.
(a) No fee shall be charged any person with a disability regardless of age, or to automobiles
transporting a non-driver with a disability, at any recreational facility owned and operated by the
state; provided, however, proper identification is presented as prescribed by the department of
environmental management. For the purpose of this section “person with a disability” shall mean
an individual who has a physical or mental impairment and is receiving:
(a)(1) Social security disability benefits (SSDI);
(b)(2) Supplemental security income benefits (SSI); or
(c)(3) Veterans benefits and who shall be determined under applicable federal law by the

federal department of veterans’ affairs to be one hundred percent (100%) disabled through a
service-connected disability.
(b) For purpose of this section, “fees” shall include all fees for parking, admittance, or other
user fees for playing golf. The term “fees” shall not include licensing fees, camping fees, picnic
table fees, or specialized facility use fees, including, but not limited to, fees for the use of equestrian
areas, performing arts centers, game fields, and mule shed; provided however, that one hundred
percent (100%) disabled veterans shall be entitled to a fifty percent (50%) reduction for licensing
fees, camping fees, picnic table fees, or specialized facility use fees.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003379
========
LC003379 - Page 2 of 3